Utah statutes.
53-3-507.   Licenses -- Cancellation, revocation, or refusal to issue or renew -- Ineligibility for license.

(1)  The department may cancel, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a commercial driver training school, commercial testing only school, school operator, or instructor license if it finds that the licensee or applicant has not complied with, or has violated this part or any rule made by the division.

(2)  A licensee:

(a)  shall return a canceled or revoked license to the division; and

(b)  is not eligible to apply for a license under this part until six months have elapsed since the date of a cancellation or revocation under this section.



Amended by Chapter 266, 2006 General Session

